apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<pardef n="sn/erpe__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>orpi</l>  <r>erpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erpt</l>  <r>erpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orpen</l> <r>erpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erpt</l>  <r>erpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orpe</l>  <r>erpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orpi</l>  <r>erpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erpte</l> <r>erpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orpne</l> <r>erpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erpte</l> <r>erpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orpne</l> <r>erpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erpande</l><r>erpe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <!-- wsd todo -->
  <e>       <p><l>erp</l>   <r>erpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erpa</l>  <r>erpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erpe</l>  <r>erpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erpast</l><r>erpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erpt</l>  <r>erpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orpe</l>  <r>erpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orpi</l>  <r>erpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erper</l> <r>erpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erp</l>   <r>erpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arp</l>   <r>erpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erpte</l> <r>erpe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v/elje__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>alt</l>   <r>elje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ald</l>   <r>elje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ald</l>   <r>elje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alt</l>   <r>elje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>alte</l>  <r>elje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alde</l>  <r>elje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>alte</l>  <r>elje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alde</l>  <r>elje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eljande</l><r>elje<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>elj</l>   <r>elje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>    <r>elje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elja</l>  <r>elje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elje</l>  <r>elje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eljast</l><r>elje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ald</l>   <r>elje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alt</l>   <r>elje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>    <r>elje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alde</l>  <r>elje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>alte</l>  <r>elje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v/ete__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>isst</l>  <r>ete<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isst</l>  <r>ete<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isste</l> <r>ete<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isste</l> <r>ete<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etande</l><r>ete<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>et</l>    <r>ete<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eta</l>   <r>ete<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>   <r>ete<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etast</l> <r>ete<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isst</l>  <r>ete<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eit</l>   <r>ete<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>isste</l> <r>ete<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="øm/me__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ma</l>    <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ma</l>    <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ma</l>    <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ma</l>    <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mande</l> <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ma</l>    <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>me</l>    <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ma</l>    <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>    <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mast</l>  <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ma</l>    <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mar</l>   <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ma</l>    <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vr/ide__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>idi</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idd</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iden</l>  <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idd</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ide</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idi</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idt</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idde</l>  <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idne</l>  <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idde</l>  <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idne</l>  <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idande</l><r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>id</l>    <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ida</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idast</l> <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idd</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ide</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idi</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idt</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ider</l>  <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>    <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eid</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idde</l>  <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="fomme">       <i>fom</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="krumme">      <i>krum</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forslumme">   <i>forslum</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tomme">           <i>tom</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fortelje">        <i>fort</i><par n="v/elje__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ramme">           <i>ram</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="stamme">          <i>stam</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="velje">           <i>v</i><par n="v/elje__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="innlemme">        <i>innlem</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="romme">           <i>rom</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amme"><i>am</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="annamme"><i>annam</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bomme"><i>bom</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bramme"><i>bram</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="brumme"><i>brum</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dumme"><i>dum</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="flamme"><i>flam</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="flomme"><i>flom</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fordumme"><i>fordum</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forkromme"><i>forkrom</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forstumme"><i>forstum</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hemme"><i>hem</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="homme"><i>hom</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jamme"><i>jam</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lamme"><i>lam</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lemme"><i>lem</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nedstamme"><i>nedstam</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="omrømme"><i>omrøm</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skamme"><i>skam</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skumme"><i>skum</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="slamme"><i>slam</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="snerpe"><i>sn</i><par n="sn/erpe__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stramme"><i>stram</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="summe"><i>sum</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="trimme"><i>trim</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tromme"><i>trom</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ømme"><i>øm</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="brumme"><i>brum</i><par n="øm/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
